pl_PL/hyph_pl_PL.dic
mozai2
moza2i3k
mu1
mur4z
murza1
murzasi1
murzasic4h
mu2r7zasic2h3l
na1
na2і1k
naіko1
na4і3ko2w1s
na4r3v
o1
o2y1
oa2
oc4h
o2c2h1m
ochmi1
och3mistr4z
oe2
o4f3f
offse1
of2f3set
oi2
o1o2
ou2
у1
у2w1c
у4w3c4z
pa1
pa1na1
paname1
pa2n3a2mer
pa1sca1
pa2s3cal
pa2s3c4h
po1
po2d1n
podni1
podni2e1
po3d4niepr4z
po2m1n
po3m2n±1
po3m2nк1
po3m2ni1
po2r1t
por2t1s
po1rtsmo1
portsmou2
po4rt2s3mo2uth
portla1
po4rt3la2n1d
poli1
poli2e1
poli3e2t
poli2u1
poli3u2re1
poіu1
poіu2d1n
poіu3d2ni1
po2w1s
pows4z
powsze1
powsze2d1n
powsze3d2ni1
p2r1c
prc4h
prcha1
pr2chal
pre1
pres4z
pre2s2z1p
pre2sz3pa1
ro1
roe2
roe2n1t
roen2t1g
roe1ntge1
ro2e3nt2gen
ro1kro1
ro2k3roc4z
ro1sto1
ro2s3to3c2k
se1
se2t3le1
sko1
skor4z
sko1rzo1
skorzone1
sko2r5zoner
s2m2r
so1
sowi1
sowi3z2
sy1
syno1
sy2n3o2p1t
syste1
sy2s1tem
sza1
s4zas4z
sza2sz1іy1
sze1
szezlo1
sze2z1lo2n1g
sze4¶ж
szto1
szto1kho1
szto2k1ho2l1m
szy1
szy2n1k
szynkwa1
szyn2k1was
to1
to2y1
to1yo2
to3y2o3t
tu1
tu2r1b
turbo1
turbo1o2
turboodr4z
tu1rboodrzu1
turboo2d3rzut
ty1
tygo1
tygo2d1n
tygo3d2ni1
u1
u2y1
ua2
ue2
ui2
uo2
u1u2
vo1
vo2l1k
vo2l2k2s3
we1
we1e2
we1e1ke1
we2e2k1e2n1d
we4s2t3f
we4s2t3m
y1
ya2
ye2
yi2
yo2
yu2
ze1
ze4p3p
ј2d4ј
.by1
.byna1
.byna2j1m
.bynaj2m1n
.bynajmni1
.bynajmni2e1
.by9naj9m8nie8j.
.bezac4h
.be9z8a8c8h.
.bezami1
.be9z8ami.
.gd4z
.gdzi1
.gdzi2e1
.gdzi1eni1
.gdzi2e1ni2e1
.2g1dzienie2g1d
.gd4zieniegd4z
.gdzi1eni1egdzi1
.gdzi2e1ni2e1gdzi2e1
.gdzienie9g8dzie.
.ina1
.inac4z
.inacze1
.in8a9cze8j.
.n8a9da8l.
.ni2g1d
.nigdy1
.n8i9gdy.
.nigd4z
.ni1gdzi1
.nigdzi2e1
.n8i9gdzie.
.nie2c2h1ї
.nie1chїe1
.nie8ch9їe.
.nie2c2h1b
.niechby1
.nie8ch9by.
.o2w1s
.ows4z
.owsze1
.ow9sze8m.
.pуіa1
.pуіac4h
.pу9і8a8c8h.
.pуіami1
.pу9і8ami.
.pу9і8e8k.
.przyna1
.przyna2j1m
.przynaj2m1n
.przynajmni1
.przynajmni2e1
.przy9naj9m8nie8j.
.sk±di1
.sk±1din±1
.sk±d9i8n±8d.
.trуja1
.trуjac4h
.trу9j8a8c8h.
.trуjami1
.trу9j8ami.
.trу9j8e8k.
.podу2w1c
.podу4w3c4z
.podуwcza1
.podу3w2czas
.po8d9у8w9cza8s.
